New York, session 2025-2026, S181.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 483-ee of the social services 2 law, as amended by chapter 496 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (a) There is established an interagency task force on trafficking in 5 persons, which shall consist of the following members or their desig- 6 nees: (1) the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services; 7 (2) the commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assist- 8 ance; (3) the commissioner of health; (4) the commissioner of the office 9 of mental health; (5) the commissioner of labor; (6) the commissioner of 10 the office of children and family services; (7) the commissioner of the 11 office of addiction services and supports; (8) the director of the 12 office of victim services; (9) the executive director of the office for 13 the prevention of domestic violence; (10) the superintendent of the 14 division of state police; (11) the secretary of state; (12) the commis- 15 sioner of the department of transportation; (13) the commissioner of the 16 department of motor vehicles; (14) the executive director of the New 17 York state thruway authority; and the following additional members, who 18 shall be promptly appointed by the governor, each for a term of two 19 years, provided that such person's membership shall continue after such 20 two year term until a successor is appointed and provided, further, that 21 a member may be reappointed if again recommended in the manner specified 22 in this subdivision: [(12)] (15) two members, who shall be appointed on 23 the recommendation of the temporary president of the senate; [(13)] (16) EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00854-01-5 S. 181 2 1 two members, who shall be appointed on the recommendation of the speaker 2 of the assembly; [(14)] (17) two members, who shall be appointed on the 3 recommendation of the not-for-profit organization in New York state that 4 receives the largest share of funds, appropriated by and through the 5 state budget, for providing services to victims of human trafficking, as 6 shall be identified annually in writing by the director of the budget; 7 and [(15)] (18) one member, who shall be appointed on the recommendation 8 of the president of the New York state bar association; and others as 9 may be necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities under this 10 section. The task force will be co-chaired by the commissioners of the 11 division of criminal justice services and the office of temporary and 12 disability assistance, or their designees. It shall meet as often as is 13 necessary, but no less than three times per year, and under circum- 14 stances as are appropriate to fulfilling its duties under this section. 15 All members shall be provided with written notice reasonably in advance 16 of each meeting with date, time and location of such meeting. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 18 the amendments to section 483-ee of the social services law made by 19 section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and 20 shall be deemed repealed therewith.